Utah statutes.
10-9a-205.   Notice of public hearings and public meetings on adoption or
modification of land use ordinance.
(1)  Each municipality shall give:
(a)  notice of the date, time, and place of the first public hearing to
consider the adoption or any modification of a land use ordinance; and
(b)  notice of each public meeting on the subject.
(2)  Each notice of a public hearing under Subsection (1)(a) shall be:
(a)  mailed to each affected entity at least 10 calendar days before the
public hearing;
(b)  posted:
(i)  in at least three public locations within the municipality; or
(ii)  on the municipality's official website; and
(c) (i) (A)  published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area at
least 10 calendar days before the public hearing; and
(B)  published in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least 10 calendar days
before the public hearing; or
(ii)  mailed at least three days before the public hearing to:
(A)  each property owner whose land is directly affected by the land use
ordinance change; and
(B)  each adjacent property owner within the parameters specified by municipal
ordinance.
(3)  Each notice of a public meeting under Subsection (1)(b) shall be at least
24 hours before the meeting and shall be posted:
(a)  in at least three public locations within the municipality; or
(b)  on the municipality's official website.
